New York, session 2025-2026, S6120.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 210-B of the tax law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 61 to read as follows: 3 61. Credit for the purchase of personal protective equipment (PPE) by 4 employers. (a) A taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the tax 5 imposed by this article for the purchase of personal protective equip- 6 ment (PPE) for use by such taxpayer's employees. The total amount of the 7 credit shall be the cost incurred in purchasing the personal protective 8 equipment (PPE) not to exceed a maximum credit of five thousand dollars. 9 (b) For the purposes of this subdivision, the following terms shall 10 have the following meanings: 11 (i) "taxpayer" shall mean any employer resident in this state employ- 12 ing five hundred or less persons. 13 (ii) "personal protective equipment (PPE)" shall mean all equipment 14 worn or used to minimize exposure to a communicable disease, including 15 but not limited to gloves, masks and faceshields. 16 (c) If the amount of credit allowable under this subdivision shall 17 exceed the taxpayer's tax for such year, the excess may be carried over 18 to the following year or years and may be deducted from the taxpayer's 19 tax for such year or years. 20 (d) If all or any part of the credit provided for under this subdivi- 21 sion was allowed or carried over from a prior taxable year or years, a 22 taxpayer shall reduce the allowable credit for additional qualifying 23 expenditures in a subsequent tax year by the amount of the credit previ- 24 ously allowed or carried over. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10636-01-5 S. 6120 2 1 § 2. Section 606 of the tax law is amended by adding a new subsection 2 (qqq) to read as follows: 3 (qqq) Credit for the purchase of personal protective equipment (PPE) 4 by employers. (1) A taxpayer shall be allowed a credit of personal 5 protective equipment (PPE) for use by such taxpayer's employees. The 6 total amount of the credit shall be the cost incurred in purchasing the 7 personal protective equipment (PPE) not to exceed a maximum credit of 8 five thousand dollars. 9 (2) For the purposes of this subsection, the following terms shall 10 have the following meanings: 11 (i) "taxpayer" shall mean any employer resident in this state employ- 12 ing five hundred or less persons. 13 (ii) "personal protective equipment (PPE)" shall mean all equipment 14 worn or used to minimize exposure to a communicable disease, including 15 but not limited to gloves, masks and faceshields. 16 (3) If the amount of credit allowable under this subsection shall 17 exceed the taxpayer's tax for such year, the excess may be carried over 18 to the following year or years and may be deducted from the taxpayer's 19 tax for such year or years. 20 (4) If all or any part of the credit provided for under this 21 subsection was allowed or carried over from a prior taxable year or 22 years, a taxpayer shall reduce the allowable credit for additional qual- 23 ifying expenditures in a subsequent tax year by the amount of the credit 24 previously allowed or carried over. 25 § 3. Subparagraph (B) of paragraph 1 of subsection (i) of section 606 26 of the tax law is amended by adding a new clause (lii) to read as 27 follows: 28 (lii) Credit for Amount of credit 29 the purchase of personal under subdivision 30 protective equipment (PPE) sixty-one of section 31 by employers under subsection two hundred ten-B 32 (qqq) 33 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately, and shall apply to the 34 taxable year in which it takes effect and all subsequent taxable years.